Hawaii statutes.
§576B-206 Continuing jurisdiction to
enforce child support order. (a) A tribunal of this State that has issued
a child support order consistent with the law of this State may serve as an
initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce:

(1) The order if the order is the controlling order
and has not been modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed
jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act; or

(2) A money judgment for arrears of support and
interest on the order accrued before a determination that an order of a
tribunal of another state is the controlling order.

(b) A tribunal of this State having continuing
jurisdiction over a support order may act as a responding tribunal to enforce
the order. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Where New Mexico had continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over
its spousal support order, New Mexico could act as a responding tribunal to
enforce or modify its order; husband and wife were subject to the continuing,
exclusive jurisdiction of New Mexico notwithstanding the fact that neither
resided in New Mexico; because Hawaii lacked continuing, exclusive jurisdiction
over New Mexico's spousal support order, Hawaii could not serve as a responding
tribunal to modify New Mexico's spousal support order, but could enforce it.
111 H. 51 (App.), 137 P.3d 365 (2006).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next